Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.22.245

Records—Admission as evidence—Certificate.

Records obtained pursuant to this chapter shall be admitted as evidence in all courts of this state, under Washington rule of evidence 902, when accompanied by a certificate substantially in the following form:

CERTIFICATE

1. The accompanying documents are true and correct copies of the records of [name of financial institution]. The records were made in the regular course of business of the financial institution at or near the time of the acts, events, or conditions which they reflect.

2. They are produced in response to a request made under *RCW 30.22.240.

3. The undersigned is authorized to execute this certificate. I CERTIFY, under penalty of perjury under the laws of the State of Washington, that the foregoing statements are true and correct.

————

————

Date

Signature

————

————

Place of Signing

Type or Print Name/

Title/Telephone No.

[ 1995 c 186 s 3. Formerly RCW 30.22.245.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 30.22.240 was recodified as RCW 30A.22.240 pursuant to 2014 c 37 s 4, effective January 5, 2015.